North Carolina statutes. Chapter 95. Department of Labor and Labor Regulations.
Article 5B. Regulation of Job Listing Services. [Repealed]

§§ 95-47.19 through 95-47.32.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-82, s. 4(a), effective July 8, 2021.

History.

G.S. 95-47.19; 1979, c. 780, s. 2; repealed by 2021-82, s. 4(a), effective July 8, 2021. G.S. 95-47.20; 1979, c. 780, s. 2; repealed by 2021-82, s. 4(a), effective July 8, 2021. G.S. 95-47.21; 1979, c. 780, s. 2; repealed by 2021-82, s. 4(a), effective July 8, 2021. G.S. 95-47.22; 1979, c. 780, s. 2; 1993, c. 172, s. 1; repealed by 2021-82, s. 4(a), effective July 8, 2021. G.S. 95-47.23; 1979, c. 780, s. 2; repealed by 2021-82, s. 4(a), effective July 8, 2021. G.S. 95-47.24; 1979, c. 780, s. 2; 1993, c. 172, s. 2; repealed by 2021-82, s. 4(a), effective July 8, 2021. G.S. 95-47.25; 1979, c. 780, s. 2; repealed by 2021-82, s. 4(a), effective July 8, 2021. G.S. 95-47.26; 1979, c. 780, s. 2; repealed by 2021-82, s. 4(a), effective July 8, 2021. G.S. 95-47.27; 1979, c. 780, s. 2; repealed by 2021-82, s. 4(a), effective July 8, 2021. G.S. 95-47.28; 1979, c. 780, s. 2; repealed by 2021-82, s. 4(a), effective July 8, 2021. G.S. 95-47.29; 1979, c. 780, s. 2; repealed by 2021-82, s. 4(a), effective July 8, 2021. G.S. 95-47.30; 1979, c. 780, s. 2; repealed by 2021-82, s. 4(a), effective July 8, 2021. G.S. 95-47.31; 1979, c. 780, s. 2; repealed by 2021-82, s. 4(a), effective July 8, 2021. G.S. 95-47.32; 1979, c. 780, s. 2; repealed by 2021-82, s. 4(a), effective July 8, 2021.